Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
431C]

LIFE
SETTLEMENTS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

431C-1 Short title

431C-2 Definitions

431C-3 Licensing requirements

431C-4 License suspension, revocation, or
refusal to renew

431C-5 Contract requirements

431C-6 Reporting requirements and privacy

Part II. Examinations

431C-11 Examination

431C-12 Conduct of examinations

431C-13 Examination reports

431C-14 Confidentiality of examination
information

431C-15 Examiner; conflict of interest

431C-16 Immunity from liability

431C-17 Investigative authority of the
commissioner

Part III. Advertising

431C-21 Advertising

Part IV. Disclosures and General Procedures

431C-31 Disclosures to owners

431C-32 Disclosure to insurer

431C-33 General rules

431C-34 Buyer's guide

Part V. Miscellaneous Provisions

431C-41 Prohibited practices

431C-42 Fraudulent life settlement acts
prohibited

431C-43 Fraud warning required

431C-44 Mandatory reporting of fraudulent life
settlement

acts

431C-45 Immunity from liability

431C-46 Confidentiality

431C-47 Other law enforcement or regulatory
authority

431C-48 Life settlement anti-fraud initiatives

431C-49 Injunctions; civil remedies; cease and
desist

431C-50 Penalties

431C-51 Unfair trade practices

431C-52 Conflict of laws

431C-53 Authority to adopt rules

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next